Arkansas, session 2025, SB474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136(b), concerning a statewide
fluoridation program, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
the company, corporation, municipality, county, government agency, or other
entity that owns or controls a water system shall control the quantity of
fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content established by the
Department of Health.
(2) The board of a public water system may elect to prohibit
fluoridation of the water it supplies.




*SSS251*
03/17/2025 12:30:23 PM SSS251